Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.770

Supported employment—Implementation.

The department of social and health services and the department of enterprise services shall, after consultation with supported employment provider associations and other interested parties, encourage, educate, and assist state agencies in implementing supported employment programs. The department of enterprise services shall provide human resources technical assistance to agencies implementing supported employment programs.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 440; 1997 c 287 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Finding—1997 c 287: See note following RCW 41.04.750.